Maryland, session 2026, HB0630.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Correctional Services
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0630*

HOUSE BILL 630
(j) “Immigration detention facility” means any building, facility, or structure
used, in whole or in part, to house or detain individuals for federal civil immigration
violations.
(n) “Person” means an individual, receiver, trustee, guardian, personal
representative, fiduciary, representative of any kind, partnership, firm, association,
corporation, or other entity.
1–102.
(a) The State, a unit of local government, a county sheriff, or an agency, officer,
employee, or agent of the State or a unit of local government may not:
(1) enter into an agreement of any kind for the detention of individuals in
an immigration detention facility owned, managed, or operated, in whole or in part, by a
private entity;
(2) pay, reimburse, subsidize, or defray in any way any costs related to the
sale, purchase, construction, development, ownership, management, or operation of an
immigration detention facility that is or will be owned, managed, or operated, in whole or
in part, by a private entity;
(3) receive any payment related to the detention of individuals in an
immigration detention facility owned, managed, or operated, in whole or in part, by a
private entity; or
(4) otherwise give any financial incentive or benefit to any private entity
or person in connection with the sale, purchase, construction, development, ownership,
management, or operation of an immigration detention facility that is or will be owned,
managed, or operated, in whole or in part, by a private entity.
(b) The State, a unit of local government, a county sheriff, or an agency, officer,
employee, or agent of the State or a unit of local government may not approve a zoning
variance or issue a permit for the construction of a building or the reuse of existing
buildings or structures by any private entity for use as an immigration detention facility
unless the governmental entity:
(1) provides notice to the public of the proposed zoning variance or permit
action at least 180 days before authorizing the variance or issuing the permit; and
(2) solicits and hears public comments on the proposed zoning variance or
permit action in at least two separate meetings open to the public.
(c) (1) The State, a unit of local government, a county sheriff, or an agency,
officer, employee, or agent of the State or a unit of local government may not enter into or
renew an immigration detention agreement.

HOUSE BILL 630 3
(2) The State, a unit of local government, a county sheriff, or an agency,
officer, employee, or agent of the State or a unit of local government with an existing
immigration detention agreement shall exercise the termination provision contained in the
immigration detention agreement not later than October 1, 2022.
(D) A PERSON MAY NOT OPERATE AN IMMIGRATION DETENTION FACILITY
AT A BUILDING, STRUCTURE, OR FACILITY THAT WAS NOT ORIGINALLY DESIGNED
AND CONSTRUCTED FOR THE PURPOSE OF HOUSING OR DETAINING INDIVIDUALS.
[(d)] (E) In any dispute over an immigration detention agreement with the
State, the provisions of this section govern.
[(e)] (F) Nothing in this section may be construed to authorize or prohibit the
State, a unit of local government, a county sheriff, or an agency, officer, employee, or agent
of the State or a unit of local government from entering into an agreement under 8 U.S.C.
§ 1357(g).
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.